District of Columbia statutes.
38-2102

Designated state official.

The “designated state official” for the District of Columbia shall be the Superintendent of Schools of the District of Columbia. The Superintendent shall enter into contracts pursuant to Article III of the Agreement only with the approval of the specific text thereof by the Board of Education of the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1615, Pub. L. 93-515, title I, § 102

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1302.
1973 Ed., § 31-1802.